Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.080

License required—Penalty.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person to conduct an employment agency business in this state unless he or she has an employment agency license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 532; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 8.]